Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 67

Religious Corporations

48-67-101. Chapters 51-68 applicable to religious corporations.

Except as provided in § 48-67-102, chapters 51-68 of this title apply to religious corporations.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 17.01.

Cross-References. Application of nonprofit corporation law, title 48, chs. 51-67, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

48-67-102. Provisions not applicable to religious corporations.

The following provisions of chapters 51-68 of this title shall not apply to religious corporations unless otherwise provided in their articles or bylaws:

Section 48-56-202;

Section 48-56-302;

Section 48-58-110(d);

Section 48-58-303; and

Section 48-64-303.

If religious doctrine or canon law governing the affairs of a religious corporation is inconsistent with chapters 51-68 of this title on the same subject, the religious doctrine or canon law shall control to the extent, and only to the extent, required by the constitution of the United States or the constitution of this state, or both.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 17.02; 2014, ch. 899, § 92.